Florida, session 2026, SB676.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âPresent subsections (2) and (3) of section 31 827.04, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3) and 32 (4), respectively, a new subsection (2) is added to that 33 section, and subsection (1) of that section is amended, to read: 34 827.04âContributing to the delinquency or dependency of a 35 child; penalty.â 36 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (2), a any person who: 37 (a)âCommits any act which causes, tends to cause, 38 encourages, or contributes to a child becoming a delinquent or 39 dependent child or a child in need of services; or 40 (b)âInduces or endeavors to induce, by act, threat, 41 command, or persuasion, a child to commit or perform any act, 42 follow any course of conduct, or live in a manner that causes or 43 tends to cause such child to become or to remain a dependent or 44 delinquent child or a child in need of services, 45 46 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 47 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 48 (2)(a)âA person who commits any act that causes, tends to 49 cause, encourages, or contributes to a child committing an 50 offense that is: 51 1.âA felony of the third degree, commits a misdemeanor of 52 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 53 775.083. 54 2.âA felony of the second degree, commits a felony of the 55 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 56 or s. 775.084. 57 3.âA felony of the first degree, commits a felony of the 58 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 59 or s. 775.084. 60 4.âA capital felony, commits a felony of the first degree, 61 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 62 (b)âA person who induces or endeavors to induce, by act, 63 threat, command, or persuasion, a child to commit an offense 64 that is: 65 1.âA felony of the third degree, commits a misdemeanor of 66 the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 67 775.083. 68 2.âA felony of the second degree, commits a felony of the 69 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 70 or s. 775.084. 71 3.âA felony of the first degree, commits a felony of the 72 second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 73 or s. 775.084. 74 4.âA capital felony, commits a felony of the first degree, 75 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 76 Section 2.âPresent subsections (4) through (7) of section 77 828.12, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) 78 through (8), respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to that 79 section, and subsection (2) of that section is republished, to 80 read: 81 828.12âCruelty to animals.â 82 (2)âA person who intentionally commits an act to any 83 animal, or a person who owns or has the custody or control of 84 any animal and fails to act, which results in the cruel death, 85 or excessive or repeated infliction of unnecessary pain or 86 suffering, or causes the same to be done, commits aggravated 87 animal cruelty, a felony of the third degree, punishable as 88 provided in s. 775.082 or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or 89 both. 90 (a)âA person convicted of a violation of this subsection, 91 where the finder of fact determines that the violation includes 92 the knowing and intentional torture or torment of an animal that 93 injures, mutilates, or kills the animal, shall be ordered to pay 94 a minimum mandatory fine of $2,500 and undergo psychological 95 counseling or complete an anger management treatment program. 96 (b)âA person convicted of a second or subsequent violation 97 of this subsection shall be required to pay a minimum mandatory 98 fine of $5,000 and serve a minimum mandatory period of 99 incarceration of 6 months. In addition, the person shall be 100 released only upon expiration of sentence, is not eligible for 101 parole, control release, or any form of early release, and must 102 serve 100 percent of the court-imposed sentence. Any plea of 103 nolo contendere shall be considered a conviction for purposes of 104 this subsection. 105 (4)âA person 18 years of age or older commits a felony of 106 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 107 775.083, or s. 775.084, if he or she causes or entices a minor 108 to commit, or in the presence of a minor commits, a violation of 109 subsection (2). 110 Section 3.âPresent subsections (4) through (10) of section 111 828.122, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (5) 112 through (11), respectively, a new subsection (4) is added to 113 that section, and subsection (3) of that section is amended, to 114 read: 115 828.122âFighting or baiting animals; offenses; penalties.â 116 (3)âA Any person who knowingly commits any of the following 117 acts commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 118 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084: 119 (a)âBaiting, breeding, training, transporting, selling, 120 owning, possessing, or using any wild or domestic animal for the 121 purpose of animal fighting or baiting; 122 (b)âOwning, possessing, or selling equipment for use in any 123 activity described in paragraph (a); 124 (c)âOwning, leasing, managing, operating, or having control 125 of any property kept or used for any activity described in 126 paragraph (a) or paragraph (b); 127 (d)âPromoting, staging, advertising, or charging any 128 admission fee to a fight or baiting between two or more animals; 129 (e)âPerforming any service or act to facilitate animal 130 fighting or baiting, including, but not limited to, providing 131 security, refereeing, or handling or transporting animals or 132 being a stakeholder of any money wagered on animal fighting or 133 baiting; 134 (f)âRemoving or facilitating the removal of any animal 135 impounded under this section from an agency where the animal is 136 impounded or from a location designated by the court under 137 subsection (5) (4), subsection (6) (5), or subsection (8) (7), 138 without the prior authorization of the court; 139 (g)âBetting or wagering any money or other valuable 140 consideration on the fighting or baiting of animals; or 141 (h)âAttending the fighting or baiting of animals. 142 143 Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection to the 144 contrary, possession of the animal alone does not constitute a 145 violation of this section. 146 (4)âA person 18 years of age or older commits a felony of 147 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 148 775.083, or s. 775.084, if he or she causes or entices a minor 149 to commit, or in the presence of a minor commits a violation of 150 subsection (3). 151 Section 4.âSubsection (6) is added to section 828.126, 152 Florida Statutes, and subsection (2) of that section is 153 republished, to read: 154 828.126âSexual activities involving animals.â 155 (2)âA person may not: 156 (a)âKnowingly engage in any sexual contact with an animal; 157 (b)âKnowingly cause, aid, or abet another person to engage 158 in any sexual contact with an animal; 159 (c)âKnowingly permit any sexual contact with an animal to 160 be conducted on any premises under his or her charge or control; 161 (d)âKnowingly organize, promote, conduct, aid, abet, 162 participate in as an observer, or advertise, offer, solicit, or 163 accept an offer of an animal for the purpose of sexual contact 164 with such animal, or perform any service in the furtherance of 165 an act involving any sexual contact with an animal; or 166 (e)âKnowingly film, distribute, or possess any pornographic 167 image or video of a person and an animal engaged in any of the 168 activities prohibited by this section. 169 (6)âA person 18 years of age or older commits a felony of 170 the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 171 775.083, or s. 775.084, if he or she causes or entices a minor 172 to commit, or in the presence of a minor commits a violation of 173 subsection (2). 174 Section 5.âParagraphs (a), (e), (f), and (g) of subsection 175 (3) of section 921.0022, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 176 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 177 chart.â 178 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 179 (a)âLEVEL 1 180 181 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 182 24.118(3)(a) 3rd Counterfeit or altered state lottery ticket. 183 104.0616(2) 3rd Unlawfully distributing, ordering, requesting, collecting, delivering, or possessing vote-by-mail ballots. 184 212.054(2)(b) 3rd Discretionary sales surtax; limitations, administration, and collection. 185 212.15(2)(b) 3rd Failure to remit sales taxes, amount $1,000 or more but less than $20,000. 186 316.1935(1) 3rd Fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer. 187 319.30(5) 3rd Sell, exchange, give away certificate of title or identification number plate. 188 319.35(1)(a) 3rd Tamper, adjust, change, etc., an odometer. 189 320.26(1)(a) 3rd Counterfeit, manufacture, or sell registration license plates or validation stickers. 190 322.212â(1)(a)-(c) 3rd Possession of forged, stolen, counterfeit, or unlawfully issued driver license; possession of simulated identification. 191 322.212(4) 3rd Supply or aid in supplying unauthorized driver license or identification card. 192 322.212(5)(a) 3rd False application for driver license or identification card. 193 414.39(3)(a) 3rd Fraudulent misappropriation of public assistance funds by employee/official, value more than $200. 194 443.071(1) 3rd False statement or representation to obtain or increase reemployment assistance benefits. 195 509.151(1) 3rd Defraud an innkeeper, food or lodging value $1,000 or more. 196 517.302(1) 3rd Violation of the Florida Securities and Investor Protection Act. 197 713.69 3rd Tenant removes property upon which lien has accrued, value $1,000 or more. 198 812.014(3)(c) 3rd Petit theft (3rd conviction); theft of any property not specified in subsection (2). 199 815.04(4)(a) 3rd Offense against intellectual property (i.e., computer programs, data). 200 817.52(2) 3rd Hiring with intent to defraud, motor vehicle services. 201 817.569(2) 3rd Use of public record or public records information or providing false information to facilitate commission of a felony. 202 826.01 3rd Bigamy. 203 828.122(3) 3rd Fighting or baiting animals. 204 831.04(1) 3rd Any erasure, alteration, etc., of any replacement deed, map, plat, or other document listed in s. 92.28. 205 831.31(1)(a) 3rd Sell, deliver, or possess counterfeit controlled substances, all but s. 893.03(5) drugs. 206 832.041(1) 3rd Stopping payment with intent to defraud $150 or more. 207 832.05(2)(b) &â(4)(c) 3rd Knowing, making, issuing worthless checks $150 or more or obtaining property in return for worthless check $150 or more. 208 838.15(2) 3rd Commercial bribe receiving. 209 838.16 3rd Commercial bribery. 210 843.18 3rd Fleeing by boat to elude a law enforcement officer. 211 847.011(1)(a) 3rd Sell, distribute, etc., obscene, lewd, etc., material (2nd conviction). 212 849.09(1)(a)-(d) 3rd Lottery; set up, promote, etc., or assist therein, conduct or advertise drawing for prizes, or dispose of property or money by means of lottery. 213 849.23 3rd Gambling-related machines; âcommon offenderâ as to property rights. 214 849.25(2) 3rd Engaging in bookmaking. 215 860.08 3rd Interfere with a railroad signal. 216 860.13(1)(a) 3rd Operate aircraft while under the influence. 217 893.13(2)(a)2. 3rd Purchase of cannabis. 218 893.13(6)(a) 3rd Possession of cannabis (more than 20 grams). 219 934.03(1)(a) 3rd Intercepts, or procures any other person to intercept, any wire or oral communication. 220 (e)âLEVEL 5 221 222 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 223 316.027(2)(a) 3rd Accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury, failure to stop; leaving scene. 224 316.1935(3)(a) 2nd Driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 225 316.80(2) 2nd Unlawful conveyance of fuel; obtaining fuel fraudulently. 226 322.34(6) 3rd Careless operation of motor vehicle with suspended license, resulting in death or serious bodily injury. 227 327.30(5)(a)2. 3rd Vessel accidents involving personal injuries other than serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 228 365.172â(14)(b)2. 2nd Misuse of emergency communications system resulting in death. 229 379.365(2)(c)1. 3rd Violation of rules relating to: willful molestation of stone crab traps, lines, or buoys; illegal bartering, trading, or sale, conspiring or aiding in such barter, trade, or sale, or supplying, agreeing to supply, aiding in supplying, or giving away stone crab trap tags or certificates; making, altering, forging, counterfeiting, or reproducing stone crab trap tags; possession of forged, counterfeit, or imitation stone crab trap tags; and engaging in the commercial harvest of stone crabs while license is suspended or revoked. 230 379.367(4) 3rd Willful molestation of a commercial harvesterâs spiny lobster trap, line, or buoy. 231 379.407(5)(b)3. 3rd Possession of 100 or more undersized spiny lobsters. 232 381.0041(11)(b) 3rd Donate blood, plasma, or organs knowing HIV positive. 233 440.10(1)(g) 2nd Failure to obtain workersâ compensation coverage. 234 440.105(5) 2nd Unlawful solicitation for the purpose of making workersâ compensation claims. 235 440.381(2) 3rd Submission of false, misleading, or incomplete information with the purpose of avoiding or reducing workersâ compensation premiums. 236 624.401(4)(b)2. 2nd Transacting insurance without a certificate or authority; premium collected $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 237 626.902(1)(c) 2nd Representing an unauthorized insurer; repeat offender. 238 790.01(3) 3rd Unlawful carrying of a concealed firearm. 239 790.162 2nd Threat to throw or discharge destructive device. 240 790.163(1) 2nd False report of bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, or use of firearms in violent manner. 241 790.221(1) 2nd Possession of short-barreled shotgun or machine gun. 242 790.23 2nd Felons in possession of firearms, ammunition, or electronic weapons or devices. 243 796.05(1) 2nd Live on earnings of a prostitute; 1st offense. 244 800.04(6)(c) 3rd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender less than 18 years of age. 245 800.04(7)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition; offender 18 years of age or older. 246 806.111(1) 3rd Possess, manufacture, or dispense fire bomb with intent to damage any structure or property. 247 810.145(4) 3rd Commercial digital voyeurism dissemination. 248 810.145(7)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; 2nd or subsequent offense. 249 810.145(8)(a) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims. 250 812.014(2)(d)3. 2nd Grand theft, 2nd degree; theft from 20 or more dwellings or their unenclosed curtilage, or any combination. 251 812.0145(2)(b) 2nd Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $10,000 or more but less than $50,000. 252 812.015â(8)(a) & (c)-(e) 3rd Retail theft; property stolen is valued at $750 or more and one or more specified acts. 253 812.015(8)(f) 3rd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 254 812.015(8)(g) 3rd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons. 255 812.019(1) 2nd Stolen property; dealing in or trafficking in. 256 812.081(3) 2nd Trafficking in trade secrets. 257 812.131(2)(b) 3rd Robbery by sudden snatching. 258 812.16(2) 3rd Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop. 259 817.034(4)(a)2. 2nd Communications fraud, value $20,000 to $50,000. 260 817.234(11)(b) 2nd Insurance fraud; property value $20,000 or more but less than $100,000. 261 817.2341(1),â(2)(a) & (3)(a) 3rd Filing false financial statements, making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity. 262 817.568(2)(b) 2nd Fraudulent use of personal identification information; value of benefit, services received, payment avoided, or amount of injury or fraud, $5,000 or more or use of personal identification information of 10 or more persons. 263 817.611(2)(a) 2nd Traffic in or possess 5 to 14 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 264 817.625(2)(b) 2nd Second or subsequent fraudulent use of scanning device, skimming device, or reencoder. 265 825.1025(4) 3rd Lewd or lascivious exhibition in the presence of an elderly person or disabled adult. 266 828.12(2) 3rd Tortures any animal with intent to inflict intense pain, serious physical injury, or death. 267 828.122(3) 3rd Fighting or baiting animals. 268 836.14(4) 2nd Person who willfully promotes for financial gain a sexually explicit image of an identifiable person without consent. 269 839.13(2)(b) 2nd Falsifying records of an individual in the care and custody of a state agency involving great bodily harm or death. 270 843.01(1) 3rd Resist officer with violence to person; resist arrest with violence. 271 847.0135(5)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious exhibition using computer; offender 18 years or older. 272 847.0137â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of pornography by electronic device or equipment. 273 847.0138â(2) & (3) 3rd Transmission of material harmful to minors to a minor by electronic device or equipment. 274 874.05(1)(b) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting another to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 275 874.05(2)(a) 2nd Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 years of age to join a criminal gang. 276 893.13(1)(a)1. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs). 277 893.13(1)(c)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis (or other s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) drugs) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 278 893.13(1)(d)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of university. 279 893.13(1)(e)2. 2nd Sell, manufacture, or deliver cannabis or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(c), (2)(c)1., (2)(c)2., (2)(c)3., (2)(c)6., (2)(c)7., (2)(c)8., (2)(c)9., (2)(c)10., (3), or (4) within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 280 893.13(1)(f)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), or (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5. drugs) within 1,000 feet of public housing facility. 281 893.13(4)(b) 2nd Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 282 893.1351(1) 3rd Ownership, lease, or rental for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 283 (f)âLEVEL 6 284 285 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 286 316.027(2)(b) 2nd Leaving the scene of a crash involving serious bodily injury. 287 316.193(2)(b) 3rd Felony DUI, 4th or subsequent conviction. 288 316.1935(4)(a) 2nd Aggravated fleeing or eluding. 289 327.30(5)(a)3. 2nd Vessel accidents involving serious bodily injury; leaving scene. 290 400.9935(4)(c) 2nd Operating a clinic, or offering services requiring licensure, without a license. 291 499.0051(2) 2nd Knowing forgery of transaction history, transaction information, or transaction statement. 292 499.0051(3) 2nd Knowing purchase or receipt of prescription drug from unauthorized person. 293 499.0051(4) 2nd Knowing sale or transfer of prescription drug to unauthorized person. 294 775.0875(1) 3rd Taking firearm from law enforcement officer. 295 784.021(1)(a) 3rd Aggravated assault; deadly weapon without intent to kill. 296 784.021(1)(b) 3rd Aggravated assault; intent to commit felony. 297 784.041 3rd Felony battery; domestic battery by strangulation. 298 784.048(3) 3rd Aggravated stalking; credible threat. 299 784.048(5) 3rd Aggravated stalking of person under 16. 300 784.07(2)(c) 2nd Aggravated assault on law enforcement officer. 301 784.074(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on sexually violent predators facility staff. 302 784.08(2)(b) 2nd Aggravated assault on a person 65 years of age or older. 303 784.081(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on specified official or employee. 304 784.082(2) 2nd Aggravated assault by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 305 784.083(2) 2nd Aggravated assault on code inspector. 306 787.02(2) 3rd False imprisonment; restraining with purpose other than those in s. 787.01. 307 787.025(2)(a) 3rd Luring or enticing a child. 308 790.115(2)(d) 2nd Discharging firearm or weapon on school property. 309 790.161(2) 2nd Make, possess, or throw destructive device with intent to do bodily harm or damage property. 310 790.164(1) 2nd False report concerning bomb, explosive, weapon of mass destruction, act of arson or violence to state property, or use of firearms in violent manner. 311 790.19 2nd Shooting or throwing deadly missiles into dwellings, vessels, or vehicles. 312 794.011(8)(a) 3rd Solicitation of minor to participate in sexual activity by custodial adult. 313 794.05(1) 2nd Unlawful sexual activity with specified minor. 314 800.04(5)(d) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but less than 16 years of age; offender less than 18 years. 315 800.04(6)(b) 2nd Lewd or lascivious conduct; offender 18 years of age or older. 316 806.031(2) 2nd Arson resulting in great bodily harm to firefighter or any other person. 317 810.02(3)(c) 2nd Burglary of occupied structure; unarmed; no assault or battery. 318 810.145(8)(b) 2nd Digital voyeurism; certain minor victims; 2nd or subsequent offense. 319 812.014(2)(b)1. 2nd Property stolen $20,000 or more, but less than $100,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 320 812.014(2)(c)5. 3rd Grand theft; third degree; firearm. 321 812.014(6) 2nd Theft; property stolen $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 322 812.015(9)(a) 2nd Retail theft; property stolen $750 or more; second or subsequent conviction. 323 812.015(9)(b) 2nd Retail theft; aggregated property stolen within 120 days is $3,000 or more; coordination of others. 324 812.015(9)(d) 2nd Retail theft; multiple thefts within specified period. 325 812.015(9)(e) 2nd Retail theft; committed with specified number of other persons and use of social media platform. 326 812.13(2)(c) 2nd Robbery, no firearm or other weapon (strong-arm robbery). 327 817.4821(5) 2nd Possess cloning paraphernalia with intent to create cloned cellular telephones. 328 817.49(2)(b)2. 2nd Willful making of a false report of a crime resulting in death. 329 817.505(4)(b) 2nd Patient brokering; 10 or more patients. 330 817.5695(3)(b) 2nd Exploitation of person 65 years of age or older, value $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 331 825.102(1) 3rd Abuse of an elderly person or disabled adult. 332 825.102(3)(c) 3rd Neglect of an elderly person or disabled adult. 333 825.1025(3) 3rd Lewd or lascivious molestation of an elderly person or disabled adult. 334 825.103(3)(c) 3rd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at less than $10,000. 335 827.03(2)(c) 3rd Abuse of a child. 336 827.03(2)(d) 3rd Neglect of a child. 337 827.071(5) 3rd Possess, control, or intentionally view any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child pornography. 338 828.12(4) 3rd Causing or enticing a minor to commit, or committing in the presence of a minor, animal cruelty. 339 828.122(4) 3rd Causing or enticing a minor to commit, or committing in the presence of a minor, fighting or baiting animals. 340 828.126(3) 3rd Sexual activities involving animals. 341 836.05 2nd Threats; extortion. 342 836.10 2nd Written or electronic threats to kill, do bodily injury, or conduct a mass shooting or an act of terrorism. 343 843.12 3rd Aids or assists person to escape. 344 847.011 3rd Distributing, offering to distribute, or possessing with intent to distribute obscene materials depicting minors. 345 847.012 3rd Knowingly using a minor in the production of materials harmful to minors. 346 847.0135(2) 3rd Facilitates sexual conduct of or with a minor or the visual depiction of such conduct. 347 893.131 2nd Distribution of controlled substances resulting in overdose or serious bodily injury. 348 914.23 2nd Retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant, with bodily injury. 349 918.13(2)(b) 2nd Tampering with or fabricating physical evidence relating to a capital felony. 350 944.35(3)(a)2. 3rd Committing malicious battery upon or inflicting cruel or inhuman treatment on an inmate or offender on community supervision, resulting in great bodily harm. 351 944.40 2nd Escapes. 352 944.46 3rd Harboring, concealing, aiding escaped prisoners. 353 944.47(1)(a)5. 2nd Introduction of contraband (firearm, weapon, or explosive) into correctional facility. 354 951.22(1)(i) 3rd Firearm or weapon introduced into county detention facility. 355 (g)âLEVEL 7 356 357 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 358 316.027(2)(c) 1st Accident involving death, failure to stop; leaving scene. 359 316.193(3)(c)2. 3rd DUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 360 316.1935(3)(b) 1st Causing serious bodily injury or death to another person; driving at high speed or with wanton disregard for safety while fleeing or attempting to elude law enforcement officer who is in a patrol vehicle with siren and lights activated. 361 327.35(3)(a)3.b. 3rd Vessel BUI resulting in serious bodily injury. 362 402.319(2) 2nd Misrepresentation and negligence or intentional act resulting in great bodily harm, permanent disfiguration, permanent disability, or death. 363 409.920â(2)(b)1.a. 3rd Medicaid provider fraud; $10,000 or less. 364 409.920â(2)(b)1.b. 2nd Medicaid provider fraud; more than $10,000, but less than $50,000. 365 456.065(2) 3rd Practicing a health care profession without a license. 366 456.065(2) 2nd Practicing a health care profession without a license which results in serious bodily injury. 367 458.327(1) 3rd Practicing medicine without a license. 368 459.013(1) 3rd Practicing osteopathic medicine without a license. 369 460.411(1) 3rd Practicing chiropractic medicine without a license. 370 461.012(1) 3rd Practicing podiatric medicine without a license. 371 462.17 3rd Practicing naturopathy without a license. 372 463.015(1) 3rd Practicing optometry without a license. 373 464.016(1) 3rd Practicing nursing without a license. 374 465.015(2) 3rd Practicing pharmacy without a license. 375 466.026(1) 3rd Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene without a license. 376 467.201 3rd Practicing midwifery without a license. 377 468.366 3rd Delivering respiratory care services without a license. 378 483.828(1) 3rd Practicing as clinical laboratory personnel without a license. 379 483.901(7) 3rd Practicing medical physics without a license. 380 484.013(1)(c) 3rd Preparing or dispensing optical devices without a prescription. 381 484.053 3rd Dispensing hearing aids without a license. 382 494.0018(2) 1st Conviction of any violation of chapter 494 in which the total money and property unlawfully obtained exceeded $50,000 and there were five or more victims. 383 560.123(8)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by a money services business. 384 560.125(5)(a) 3rd Money services business by unauthorized person, currency or payment instruments exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 385 655.50(10)(b)1. 3rd Failure to report financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000 by financial institution. 386 775.21(10)(a) 3rd Sexual predator; failure to register; failure to renew driver license or identification card; other registration violations. 387 775.21(10)(b) 3rd Sexual predator working where children regularly congregate. 388 775.21(10)(g) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual predator; harbor or conceal a sexual predator. 389 782.051(3) 2nd Attempted felony murder of a person by a person other than the perpetrator or the perpetrator of an attempted felony. 390 782.07(1) 2nd Killing of a human being by the act, procurement, or culpable negligence of another (manslaughter). 391 782.071 2nd Killing of a human being or unborn child by the operation of a motor vehicle in a reckless manner (vehicular homicide). 392 782.072 2nd Killing of a human being by the operation of a vessel in a reckless manner (vessel homicide). 393 784.045(1)(a)1. 2nd Aggravated battery; intentionally causing great bodily harm or disfigurement. 394 784.045(1)(a)2. 2nd Aggravated battery; using deadly weapon. 395 784.045(1)(b) 2nd Aggravated battery; perpetrator aware victim pregnant. 396 784.048(4) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of injunction or court order. 397 784.048(7) 3rd Aggravated stalking; violation of court order. 398 784.07(2)(d) 1st Aggravated battery on law enforcement officer. 399 784.074(1)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on sexually violent predators facility staff. 400 784.08(2)(a) 1st Aggravated battery on a person 65 years of age or older. 401 784.081(1) 1st Aggravated battery on specified official or employee. 402 784.082(1) 1st Aggravated battery by detained person on visitor or other detainee. 403 784.083(1) 1st Aggravated battery on code inspector. 404 787.025(2)(b) 2nd Luring or enticing a child; second or subsequent offense. 405 787.025(2)(c) 2nd Luring or enticing a child with a specified prior conviction. 406 787.06(3)(a)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services of an adult. 407 787.06(3)(e)2. 1st Human trafficking using coercion for labor and services by the transfer or transport of an adult from outside Florida to within the state. 408 790.07(4) 1st Specified weapons violation subsequent to previous conviction of s. 790.07(1) or (2). 409 790.16(1) 1st Discharge of a machine gun under specified circumstances. 410 790.165(2) 2nd Manufacture, sell, possess, or deliver hoax bomb. 411 790.165(3) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use any hoax bomb while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 412 790.166(3) 2nd Possessing, selling, using, or attempting to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction. 413 790.166(4) 2nd Possessing, displaying, or threatening to use a hoax weapon of mass destruction while committing or attempting to commit a felony. 414 790.23 1st,PBL Possession of a firearm by a person who qualifies for the penalty enhancements provided for in s. 874.04. 415 794.08(4) 3rd Female genital mutilation; consent by a parent, guardian, or a person in custodial authority to a victim younger than 18 years of age. 416 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 2nd offense. 417 796.05(1) 1st Live on earnings of a prostitute; 3rd and subsequent offense. 418 800.04(5)(c)1. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim younger than 12 years of age; offender younger than 18 years of age. 419 800.04(5)(c)2. 2nd Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years of age; offender 18 years of age or older. 420 800.04(5)(e) 1st Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 16 years; offender 18 years or older; prior conviction for specified sex offense. 421 806.01(2) 2nd Maliciously damage structure by fire or explosive. 422 810.02(3)(a) 2nd Burglary of occupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 423 810.02(3)(b) 2nd Burglary of unoccupied dwelling; unarmed; no assault or battery. 424 810.02(3)(d) 2nd Burglary of occupied conveyance; unarmed; no assault or battery. 425 810.02(3)(e) 2nd Burglary of authorized emergency vehicle. 426 812.014(2)(a)1. 1st Property stolen, valued at $100,000 or more or a semitrailer deployed by a law enforcement officer; property stolen while causing other property damage; 1st degree grand theft. 427 812.014(2)(b)2. 2nd Property stolen, cargo valued at less than $50,000, grand theft in 2nd degree. 428 812.014(2)(b)3. 2nd Property stolen, emergency medical equipment; 2nd degree grand theft. 429 812.014(2)(b)4. 2nd Property stolen, law enforcement equipment from authorized emergency vehicle. 430 812.014(2)(g) 2nd Grand theft; second degree; firearm with previous conviction of s. 812.014(2)(c)5. 431 812.0145(2)(a) 1st Theft from person 65 years of age or older; $50,000 or more. 432 812.019(2) 1st Stolen property; initiates, organizes, plans, etc., the theft of property and traffics in stolen property. 433 812.131(2)(a) 2nd Robbery by sudden snatching. 434 812.133(2)(b) 1st Carjacking; no firearm, deadly weapon, or other weapon. 435 817.034(4)(a)1. 1st Communications fraud, value greater than $50,000. 436 817.234(8)(a) 2nd Solicitation of motor vehicle accident victims with intent to defraud. 437 817.234(9) 2nd Organizing, planning, or participating in an intentional motor vehicle collision. 438 817.234(11)(c) 1st Insurance fraud; property value $100,000 or more. 439 817.2341â(2)(b) & (3)(b) 1st Making false entries of material fact or false statements regarding property values relating to the solvency of an insuring entity which are a significant cause of the insolvency of that entity. 440 817.418(2)(a) 3rd Offering for sale or advertising personal protective equipment with intent to defraud. 441 817.504(1)(a) 3rd Offering or advertising a vaccine with intent to defraud. 442 817.535(2)(a) 3rd Filing false lien or other unauthorized document. 443 817.611(2)(b) 2nd Traffic in or possess 15 to 49 counterfeit credit cards or related documents. 444 825.102(3)(b) 2nd Neglecting an elderly person or disabled adult causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 445 825.103(3)(b) 2nd Exploiting an elderly person or disabled adult and property is valued at $10,000 or more, but less than $50,000. 446 827.03(2)(b) 2nd Neglect of a child causing great bodily harm, disability, or disfigurement. 447 827.04(4)827.04(3) 3rd Impregnation of a child under 16 years of age by person 21 years of age or older. 448 827.071(2) & (3) 2nd Use or induce a child in a sexual performance, or promote or direct such performance. 449 827.071(4) 2nd Possess with intent to promote any photographic material, motion picture, etc., which includes child pornography. 450 828.126(6) 3rd Causing or enticing a minor to commit, or committing in the presence of a minor, sexual activities involving animals. 451 837.05(2) 3rd Giving false information about alleged capital felony to a law enforcement officer. 452 838.015 2nd Bribery. 453 838.016 2nd Unlawful compensation or reward for official behavior. 454 838.021(3)(a) 2nd Unlawful harm to a public servant. 455 838.22 2nd Bid tampering. 456 843.0855(2) 3rd Impersonation of a public officer or employee. 457 843.0855(3) 3rd Unlawful simulation of legal process. 458 843.0855(4) 3rd Intimidation of a public officer or employee. 459 847.0135(3) 3rd Solicitation of a child, via a computer service, to commit an unlawful sex act. 460 847.0135(4) 2nd Traveling to meet a minor to commit an unlawful sex act. 461 872.06 2nd Abuse of a dead human body. 462 874.05(2)(b) 1st Encouraging or recruiting person under 13 to join a criminal gang; second or subsequent offense. 463 874.10 1st,PBL Knowingly initiates, organizes, plans, finances, directs, manages, or supervises criminal gang-related activity. 464 893.13(1)(c)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine (or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5.) within 1,000 feet of a child care facility, school, or state, county, or municipal park or publicly owned recreational facility or community center. 465 893.13(1)(e)1. 1st Sell, manufacture, or deliver cocaine or other drug prohibited under s. 893.03(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(d), (2)(a), (2)(b), or (2)(c)5., within 1,000 feet of property used for religious services or a specified business site. 466 893.13(4)(a) 1st Use or hire of minor; deliver to minor other controlled substance. 467 893.135(1)(a)1. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more than 25 lbs., less than 2,000 lbs. 468 893.135â(1)(b)1.a. 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more than 28 grams, less than 200 grams. 469 893.135â(1)(c)1.a. 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs, more than 4 grams, less than 14 grams. 470 893.135â(1)(c)2.a. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 28 grams or more, less than 50 grams. 471 893.135â(1)(c)2.b. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 50 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 472 893.135â(1)(c)3.a. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 7 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 473 893.135â(1)(c)3.b. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 14 grams or more, less than 25 grams. 474 893.135â(1)(c)4.b.(I) 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 475 893.135â(1)(d)1.a. 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine, 28 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 476 893.135(1)(e)1. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone, 200 grams or more, less than 5 kilograms. 477 893.135(1)(f)1. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 14 grams or more, less than 28 grams. 478 893.135â(1)(g)1.a. 1st Trafficking in flunitrazepam, 4 grams or more, less than 14 grams. 479 893.135â(1)(h)1.a. 1st Trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 480 893.135â(1)(j)1.a. 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, 1 kilogram or more, less than 5 kilograms. 481 893.135â(1)(k)2.a. 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines, 10 grams or more, less than 200 grams. 482 893.135â(1)(m)2.a. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 280 grams or more, less than 500 grams. 483 893.135â(1)(m)2.b. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 500 grams or more, less than 1,000 grams. 484 893.135â(1)(n)2.a. 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl phenethylamines, 14 grams or more, less than 100 grams. 485 893.1351(2) 2nd Possession of place for trafficking in or manufacturing of controlled substance. 486 896.101(5)(a) 3rd Money laundering, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 487 896.104(4)(a)1. 3rd Structuring transactions to evade reporting or registration requirements, financial transactions exceeding $300 but less than $20,000. 488 943.0435(4)(c) 2nd Sexual offender vacating permanent residence; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 489 943.0435(8) 2nd Sexual offender; remains in state after indicating intent to leave; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 490 943.0435(9)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 491 943.0435(13) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 492 943.0435(14) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 493 944.607(9) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to comply with reporting requirements. 494 944.607(10)(a) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 495 944.607(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 496 944.607(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 497 985.4815(10) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to submit to the taking of a digitized photograph. 498 985.4815(12) 3rd Failure to report or providing false information about a sexual offender; harbor or conceal a sexual offender. 499 985.4815(13) 3rd Sexual offender; failure to report and reregister; failure to respond to address verification; providing false registration information. 500 Section 6.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 501 39.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 502 39.201âRequired reports of child abuse, abandonment, or 503 neglect, sexual abuse of a child, and juvenile sexual abuse; 504 required reports of death; reports involving a child who has 505 exhibited inappropriate sexual behavior.â 506 (3)âADDITIONAL CIRCUMSTANCES RELATED TO REPORTS.â 507 (c)âAbuse involving impregnation of a child.âA report must 508 be immediately electronically transferred to the appropriate 509 county sheriffâs office or other appropriate law enforcement 510 agency by the central abuse hotline if the report is of an 511 instance of known or suspected child abuse involving 512 impregnation of a child 15 years of age or younger by a person 513 21 years of age or older under s. 827.04(4) s. 827.04(3). If the 514 report is of known or suspected child abuse under s. 827.04(4) 515 s. 827.04(3), subsection (1) does not apply to health care 516 professionals or other professionals who provide medical or 517 counseling services to pregnant children when such reporting 518 would interfere with the provision of such medical or counseling 519 services. 520 Section 7.âSection 90.4025, Florida Statutes, is amended to 521 read: 522 90.4025âAdmissibility of paternity determination in certain 523 criminal prosecutions.âIf a person less than 18 years of age 524 gives birth to a child and the paternity of that child is 525 established under chapter 742, such evidence of paternity is 526 admissible in a criminal prosecution under ss. 794.011, 794.05, 527 800.04, and 827.04(4) 827.04(3). 528 Section 8.âSection 382.356, Florida Statutes, is amended to 529 read: 530 382.356âProtocol for sharing certain birth certificate 531 information.âIn order to facilitate the prosecution of offenses 532 under s. 794.011, s. 794.05, s. 800.04, or s. 827.04(4) s. 533 827.04(3), the Department of Health, the Department of Revenue, 534 and the Florida Prosecuting Attorneys Association shall develop 535 a protocol for sharing birth certificate information for all 536 children born to unmarried mothers who are less than 17 years of 537 age at the time of the childâs birth. 538 Section 9.âSection 409.2355, Florida Statutes, is amended 539 to read: 540 409.2355âPrograms for prosecution of males over age 21 who 541 commit certain offenses involving girls under age 16.âSubject to 542 specific appropriated funds, the Department of Children and 543 Families is directed to establish a program by which local 544 communities, through the state attorneyâs office of each 545 judicial circuit, may apply for grants to fund innovative 546 programs for the prosecution of males over the age of 21 who 547 victimize girls under the age of 16 in violation of s. 794.011, 548 s. 794.05, s. 800.04, s. 827.04(4) s. 827.04(3), or s. 549 847.0135(5). 550 Section 10.âSubsection (4) of section 742.107, Florida 551 Statutes, is amended to read: 552 742.107âDetermining paternity of child with mother under 16 553 years of age when impregnated.â 554 (4)âWhen the information provided by the applicant or 555 recipient who was impregnated while under age 16 indicates that 556 such person is the victim of child abuse as provided in s. 557 827.04(4) s. 827.04(3), the Department of Revenue or the 558 Department of Children and Families shall notify the county 559 sheriffâs office or other appropriate agency or official and 560 provide information needed to protect the childâs health or 561 welfare. 562 Section 11.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.